Hawaii statutes.
§428-203 Articles of organization.
(a) Articles of organization of a limited liability company shall set forth:

(1) The name of the company;

(2) The mailing address of the company's initial
principal office and the information required by section 425R-4(a);

(3) The name and address of each organizer;

(4) Whether the duration of the company is for a
specified term and, if so, the period specified;

(5) Whether the company is to be manager-managed,
and:

(A) If so, the name and address of each
initial manager, and the number of initial members; or

(B) If not, the name and address of each
initial member; and

(6) Whether the members of the company are to be
liable for its debts and obligations under section 428-303(c).

(b) Articles of organization of a limited
liability company may set forth:

(1) Provisions permitted to be set forth in an
operating agreement; or

(2) Other matters not inconsistent with law.

(c) Articles of organization of a limited
liability company may not vary the nonwaivable provisions of section
428-103(b). As to all other matters, if any provision of an operating
agreement is inconsistent with the articles of organization:

(1) The operating agreement controls as to managers,
members, and members' transferees; and

(2) The articles of organization control as to
persons other than managers, members, and their transferees who rely on the
articles to their detriment.

(d) The duration of a limited liability
company is at-will unless a term for its duration is specified in its articles
of organization. [L 1996, c 92, pt of §1; am L 2000, c 219, §70; am L 2002, c
130, §104; am L 2009, c 55, §55]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next